Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 1
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 119, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED
BY THE DEPARTMENT

PART 3 COLORADO BRAIN INJURY
PROGRAM

PART 4 AUTISM COMMISSION

PART 5 TASK FORCE ON CHILDREN
CONCEIVED BY RAPE

PART 6 RESPITE CARE TASK FORCE

PART 7 RESPITE CARE